Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.260

Laned highway.

"Laned highway" means a highway the roadway of which is divided into clearly marked lanes for vehicular traffic.

[ 1961 c 12 s 46.04.260. Prior: 1959 c 49 s 27; prior: 1937 c 189 s 1, part; RRS s 6360-1, part.]